Nebraska, session 109, LB504.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Sections 1 to 9 of this act shall be known and may be cited as
the Age-Appropriate Online Design Code Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Age-Appropriate Online Design Code Act:
(1) Actual knowledge includes all information and inferences known to the
covered online service relating to the age of the individual, including, but
not limited to, self-identified age, and any age the covered online service has
attributed or associated with the individual for any purpose, including
marketing, advertising, or product development. If a covered online service's
classification of an individual for purposes of marketing or advertising is
inconsistent with the individual's self-identified age, a covered online
service shall disregard self-identified age for purposes of the act;
(2) Child means an individual younger than thirteen years of age;
(3) Covered design feature means any feature or component of a covered
online service that will encourage or increase the frequency, time spent, or
activity of a user on the covered online service and includes:
(a) Infinite scroll;
(b) Rewards or incentives for frequency of visits or time spent on the
covered online service;
(c) Notifications or push alerts;
(d) In-game purchases; or
(e) Appearance-altering filters;
(4) Covered minor means a user that a covered online service knows to be a
minor;
(5)(a) Covered online service means a sole proprietorship, a limited
liability company, a corporation, an association, or any other legal entity
that owns, operates, controls, or provides an online service that:
(i) Conducts business in this state;
(ii) Alone, or jointly with its affiliates, subsidiaries, or parent
companies, determines the purposes and means of the processing of consumers'
personal data;
(iii) Has annual gross revenue in excess of twenty-five million dollars,
adjusted every odd-numbered year to reflect changes in the Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers published by the Federal Bureau of Labor Statistics for
the two-year period preceding the adjustment date. The amount shall be rounded
to the next highest one-thousand-dollar amount;
(iv) Annually buys, receives, sells, or shares the personal data of fifty
thousand or more consumers, households, or devices, alone or in combination
with its affiliates, subsidiaries, or parent companies; and
(v) Derives at least fifty percent of its annual revenue from the sale or
sharing of consumers' personal data.
(b) A covered online service includes:
(i) An entity that controls or is controlled by a business that meets the
definition of covered online service if the entity and business share a name,
service mark, or trademark that would cause a reasonable consumer to understand
that the entity and business are commonly owned; and
(ii) For a covered online service that is a joint venture or partnership,
any person with an ownership interest of forty percent or more in such venture
or partnership.
(c) A covered online service does not include an online service with
actual knowledge that fewer than two percent of its users are minors, provided
that, in making such assessment, an online service shall not be required to
collect personal data of users, and if an online service collects personal data
of users for such purpose, it shall not use such personal data for other
purposes and shall delete such personal data after using it to make the
assessment;
(6) Dark pattern means a user interface designed or manipulated with the
effect of substantially subverting or impairing user autonomy, decision-making,
or choice. Dark pattern includes any practice determined to be a dark pattern
by the Federal Trade Commission as of January 1, 2024;
(7) Knows to be a child or knows to be a minor means actual knowledge that
the user is a child or minor, as applicable;
(8) Minor means an individual younger than eighteen years of age;
(9) Online service means any service, product, or feature that is
accessible to the public via the Internet, including a website or application.
An online service does not include any of the following:
(a) A telecommunications service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153;
(b) A broadband Internet access service as defined in 47 C.F.R. 8.1(b); or
-1-

LB504 LB504
2025 2025
(c) The sale, delivery, or use of a physical device;
(10) Parent has the same meaning as in the federal Children's Online
Privacy Protection Act of 1998, 15 U.S.C. 6501 et seq., and the Federal Trade
Commission rules implementing such act;
(11) Personal data means any information, including derived data and
unique identifiers, that is linked or reasonably linkable, alone or in
combination with other information, to an identified or identifiable individual
or to a device that identifies, is linked to, or is reasonably linkable to one
or more identified or identifiable individuals in a household. Personal data
does not include publicly available data;
(12) Personalized recommendation system means a fully or partially
automated system used to suggest, promote, or rank content, including other
users, hashtags, or posts, based on the personal data of users;
(13) Precise geolocation information means any data that identifies within
a radius of one thousand seven hundred fifty feet a covered minor's present or
past location or the present or past location of a device that links or is
linkable to a covered minor or any data that is derived from a device that is
used or intended to be used to locate a covered minor within a radius of one
thousand seven hundred fifty feet by means of technology that includes a global
positioning system that provides latitude and longitude coordinates. Precise
geolocation information does not include the content of communications or any
data generated or connected to advanced utility metering infrastructure systems
or equipment for use by a utility;
(14) Process means to perform an operation or set of operations by manual
or automated means on personal data. Process includes collecting, using,
storing, disclosing, sharing, analyzing, deleting, or modifying personal data;
(15) Profile means any form of automated processing of personal data to
evaluate, analyze, or predict certain aspects relating to a covered minor,
including a covered minor's economic situation, health, personal preferences,
interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements;
(16) Publicly available data means data (a) that is lawfully made
available from federal, state, or local government records, (b) that a business
has a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general
public by the individual or from widely distributed media, or (c) that is made
available by a person to whom the individual has disclosed the data if the
individual has not restricted the data to a specific audience. Publicly
available data does not mean biometric data collected by a covered online
service about a covered minor without the covered minor's knowledge;
(17) Targeted advertising means displaying advertisements to an individual
when the advertisement is selected based on personal data obtained or inferred
from that individual's activities over time and across nonaffiliated websites
or online applications to predict the individual's preferences or interest.
Targeted advertising does not include:
(a) Advertisements based on activities within a covered online service's
own Internet websites or online applications;
(b) Advertisements based on the context of an individual's current search
query, visit to an Internet website, or use of an online application;
(c) Advertisements directed to an individual in response to the
individual's request for information or feedback; or
(d) Processing personal data solely to measure or report advertising
frequency, performance, or reach; and
(18) User means, with respect to a covered online service, an individual
who registers an account or creates a profile on the covered online service.
Sec. 3. (1) The Age-Appropriate Online Design Code Act does not apply to:
(a) A federal, state, tribal, or local government entity in the ordinary
course of its operations;
(b) Personal data subject to a statute or regulation that is controlled by
a covered online service that is required to comply with:
(i) Title V of the federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act;
(ii) The federal Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical
Health Act; or
(iii) Regulations promulgated under section 264 of the federal Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996; and
(c) Information, including, but not limited to, personal data, collected
as part of a clinical trial subject to the federal policy for the protection of
human subjects in accordance with:
(i) Good clinical practice guidelines issued by the International Council
for Harmonisation of Technical Requirements for Pharmaceuticals for Human Use;
or
(ii) Human subject protection requirements of the federal Food and Drug
Administration.
(2) The requirements of the Age-Appropriate Online Design Code Act are in
addition to and shall not limit or restrict in any way the application of other
laws, including, but not limited to, statutes, rules and regulations, and the
common law of Nebraska.
(3) In the event of a conflict between the Age-Appropriate Online Design
Code Act and one or more other laws, the law that affords the greatest
protection from harm to minors shall control.
Sec. 4. (1) A covered online service shall provide each covered minor
with accessible and easy-to-use tools that accomplish the following with
respect to covered design features:
(a) Limit the ability of other users or visitors to communicate with the
covered minor;
-2-

LB504 LB504
2025 2025
(b) Prevent other individuals from viewing the personal data of the
covered minor;
(c) Control the operation of all design features, including, but not
limited to, all covered design features, that are unnecessary in order to
provide the covered online service by allowing a covered minor to opt out of
the use of all unnecessary covered design features or categories of unnecessary
covered design features;
(d) Control personalized recommendation systems by allowing a covered
minor to opt in to a chronological feed or by preventing categories of content
from being recommended;
(e) Control the use of in-game purchases or other transactions by allowing
a covered minor to opt out of all such purchases and transactions or to place
limits on such purchases and transactions; and
(f) Restrict the sharing of the precise geolocation information of the
covered minor and provide notice regarding tracking of the covered minor's
precise geolocation information.
(2) A covered online service shall provide a covered minor with accessible
and easy-to-use options to limit the amount of time the covered minor spends on
the covered online service.
(3) A covered online service shall establish default settings for the
safeguards required by subsection (1) of this section at the option or level
that provides the highest protection available for the safety of the covered
minor.
Sec. 5. (1) A covered online service shall only collect and use the
minimum amount of a covered minor's personal data necessary to provide the
specific elements of an online service with which the covered minor has
knowingly engaged. Such personal data shall not be used for reasons other than
those for which it was collected.
(2) A covered online service shall not be required to collect the personal
data of a user to comply with the Age-Appropriate Online Design Code Act. A
covered online service that collects personal data of a user for age
verification cannot use such personal data for other purposes and shall delete
such personal data after use for age verification.
(3) A covered online service shall only retain the personal data of a
covered minor as long as necessary to provide the specific elements of an
online service with which the covered minor has knowingly engaged.
(4) A covered online service shall not facilitate targeted advertising to
a covered minor.
(5) A covered online service shall provide an obvious sign to a covered
minor when precise geolocation information is being collected or used.
(6) The use of notifications and push alerts to a covered minor is
prohibited between the hours of 10 p.m. and 6 a.m. and between the hours of 8
a.m. and 4 p.m. on week days during the school year in the covered minor's
local time zone.
(7) A covered online service shall not profile a covered minor unless
profiling is necessary to provide a covered online service requested by such
covered minor, and only with respect to the aspects of the covered online
service with which the covered minor is actively and knowingly engaged.
(8) A covered online service shall ensure that the default settings for
the protections required pursuant to this section are set at the highest
protection available for the safety of the covered minor.
(9) If a covered online service allows parental monitoring, the covered
online service shall provide an obvious signal to a covered minor when such
minor is being monitored.
Sec. 6. (1) A covered online service shall provide parents with tools to
help parents protect and support minors using covered design features of the
covered online service. Such parental tools shall be enabled by default for an
individual the covered online service knows to be a child.
(2) With respect to covered design features, a covered online service
shall provide parents the ability to do the following for an individual the
covered online service knows to be a child or minor, as applicable:
(a) Manage the child's privacy and account settings in a manner that
allows parents to:
(i) View the child's account settings; and
(ii) Change and control privacy and account settings of the child;
(b) Restrict purchases and financial transactions of the minor; and
(c) Enable parents to view the total time the child has spent on a covered
online service and place reasonable limits on such child's use of the covered
online service. Among such protections, a covered online service shall offer
parents the ability to restrict a child's use of the covered online service
during times of day specified by the parents, including during school hours and
at night.
(3) A covered online service shall notify a covered minor of a covered
design feature when any of the tools described in this section are in effect
and describe what settings have been applied.
Sec. 7. A covered online service shall establish mechanisms for covered
minors and parents to report harms on covered online services.
Sec. 8. (1) A covered online service is prohibited from facilitating
advertisements for prohibited products, such as narcotic drugs, tobacco
products, gambling, and alcohol, to covered minors.
(2) A covered online service is prohibited from using dark patterns to
subvert or impair covered minor autonomy, decision-making, or choice.
Sec. 9. (1) Any violation of the Age-Appropriate Online Design Code Act
-3-

LB504 LB504
2025 2025
shall, additionally and separately, constitute a deceptive trade practice under
the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act. Civil penalties for violations of
the Age-Appropriate Online Design Code Act shall be subject exclusively to
subsection (3) of this section, but the Attorney General shall not initiate any
action to recover a civil penalty under the act until July 1, 2026. The Age-
Appropriate Online Design Code Act shall not be construed to affect the
liability for any action that otherwise violates the Uniform Deceptive Trade
Practices Act.
(2) Each covered online service shall designate one or more of its
officers to be responsible for the covered online service's compliance with the
Age-Appropriate Online Design Code Act.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2026, a covered online service in violation of the
Age-Appropriate Online Design Code Act may be liable for a civil penalty not to
exceed fifty thousand dollars for each violation. All penalties collected under
this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in
accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 10. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 11. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect the
validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
-4-